ja: ドラムヘッドフープ／カラータイプ: アルミニウムフープ; ローカラー; 標準フレッシュフープ; スチールフープ; ワイドカラー; その他
fi: Rumpukalvon vanteen/kauluksen tyyppi: Alumiinivanne; Matala kaulus; Vakiovanne; Teräsvanne; Leveä kaulus; Muu
ko: 드럼 헤드 후프/칼라 유형: 알루미늄 후프; 로우 칼라; 표준 플레시 후프; 스틸 후프; 와이드 칼라; 기타
th: ประเภทของขอบ/คอหนังกลอง: ขอบอะลูมิเนียม; คอเตี้ย; ขอบหนังมาตรฐาน; ขอบเหล็ก; คอกว้าง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 鼓皮框/項圈類型: 鋁製鼓框; 低鼓環; 標準鼓皮框; 鋼製鼓框; 寬鼓環; 其他
sk-SK: Typ obruče/prstenca bubnovej blany: Hliníková obruč; Nízky golier; Štandardný výstužný kruh; Oceľová obruč; Široký golier; Iné
lt-LT: Būgno membranos lanko / apvado tipas: Aliuminio lankas; Žemas apvadas; Standartinis odos lankas; Plieno lankas; Platus apvadas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип обръч/яка на барабанната мембрана: Алуминиев обръч; Нисък борд; Стандартен кожен обръч; Стоманен обръч; Широк борд; Друго
es: Tipo de aro o collar de cabezal de tambor: Aro de aluminio; Cuello bajo; Aro de montaje estándar; Aro de acero; Cuello ancho; Otro
it: Tipo di cerchio/collarino della pelle del tamburo: Cerchio in alluminio; Colletto basso; Cerchio in pelle standard; Cerchio in acciaio; Colletto largo; Altro
pl: Typ obręczy do korpusu bębna: Obręcz aluminiowa; Niski kołnierz; Standardowa obręcz naciągu; Obręcz stalowa; Szeroki kołnierz; Inne
da: Trommeskindets bøjle-/kravetype: Aluminium-reife; Lav krave; Standard skindsring; Stålreife; Bred krave; Andet
de: Typ des Trommelfell-Spannreifens-/Fellkragens: Aluminiumreifen; Niedriger Kragen; Standard-Fellreifen; Stahlreifen; Breiter Kragen; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de aro/colar de pele de tambor: Aro de alumínio; Aro baixo; Aro de pele padrão; Aro de aço; Aro largo; Outros
vi: Loại vành giữ mặt trống: Vành nhôm; Viền thấp; Vành cố định tiêu chuẩn; Vành thép; Viền rộng; Khác
en: Drum head hoop/collar type: Aluminum hoop; Low collar; Standard flesh hoop; Steel hoop; Wide collar; Other
ru: Тип обода/кольца барабанной мембраны: Алюминиевый обруч; Низкий воротник; Стандартный обруч для крепления; Стальный обруч; Широкий воротник; Другое
hu: Dobbőr perem-/gallértípusa: Alumínium káva; Alacsony perem; Normál bőrkarika; Acél káva; Széles perem; Egyéb
nl: Type spanring/kraag van drumvel: Aluminium spanrand; Lage kraag; Standaard huidrand; Stalen spanrand; Brede kraag; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta obruča/ovratnika glave bubnja: Aluminijski obruč; Niski rub; Standardni obruč za kožu; Čelični obruč; Široki rub; Ostalo
nb: Type kragefeste til trommehode: Aluminiumsring; Lav krage; Standard skinnholder; Stålring; Bred krage; Annet
cs: Typ obruče/límce bubnové blány: Hliníkový ráfek; Nízký límec; Standardní napínací kruh; Ocelový ráfek; Široký límec; Jiné
zh-CN: 鼓皮箍/圈类型: 铝制鼓圈; 低领; 标准肉圈; 钢制鼓圈; 宽领; 其他
el: Τύπος στεφάνης/δακτυλίου κεφαλής τυμπάνου: Στεφάνι αλουμινίου; Χαμηλό κολάρο; Τυπικό στεφάνι στήριξης δέρματος; Ατσάλινο στεφάνι; Πλατύ κολάρο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de aro/borda da pele do tambor: Aro de alumínio; Colar baixo; Aro de pele padrão; Aro de aço; Colar largo; Outro
fr: Type de cerclage/collier de peau de tambour: Cercle en aluminium; Collier bas; Cercle de montage standard; Cercle en acier; Collier large; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de ramă/guler pentru membrana de tobă: Cerc din aluminiu; Guler jos; Cerc de fixare standard; Cerc din oțel; Guler lat; Altele
tr: Davul derisi çember tipi: Alüminyum kasnak; Alçak yaka; Standart deri kasnağı; Çelik kasnak; Geniş yaka; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta obroča opne za boben: Aluminijast obroč; Nizek ovratnik; Standardni obroč za napenjanje kože; Jeklen obroč; Širok ovratnik; Drugo
sv: Typ av : Aluminiumsarg; Låg krage; Standardskinnring; Stålsarg; Bred krage; Övrigt